Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,210
Actions to which state is a party; fees; how paid and taxed.

The fees of the sheriff, the clerk, or other officers, or of witnesses, in claims or suits to which the state is a party, shall be the same, and be paid and taxed in the same manner as in other civil actions in the district courts.

Laws 1877, § 10, p. 22;

R.S.1913, § 1186;

C.S.1922, § 1109;

C.S.1929, § 27-328;

R.S.1943, § 24-328;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-328.

Payment of docket fee in civil cases, see section 33-106.